Alaska, session 34, HB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 42.04.010(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) The commission shall annually elect one of its members to serve as chair 06 for the following fiscal year. When a vacancy occurs in the office of chair, the 07 commission shall elect one of its members to serve the remaining term as chair. The 08 term as chair is one year. A member of the commission may not continue to serve 09 as chair after the member's term of office as a commissioner expires, even if the 10 member continues to hold office under AS 42.04.020(b) until a successor is 11 appointed and qualified. The chair may be elected to not more than three successive 12 terms as chair. After a year of not serving as chair, the commissioner is eligible for 13 election as chair again. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 42.04.020(a) is amended to read: 01 (a) The commission consists of five commissioners appointed by the governor 02 and confirmed by the legislature in joint session. At least one member of the 03 commission must, at the time of appointment, reside in a rural community served 04 by an electric utility that receives power cost equalization under AS 42.45.100 - 05 42.45.150. To qualify for appointment as a commissioner, a person must 06 (1) be a member in good standing of the Alaska Bar Association with 07 at least five years of actual experience in the practice of law; 08 (2) be a professional engineer registered under AS 08.48; or 09 (3) have a degree from an accredited college or university with a major 10 in finance, economics, accounting, business administration, or public administration 11 and at least five years of actual experience in the field associated with the degree. 12 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 TRANSITION: REGULATORY COMMISSION OF ALASKA MEMBERS. An 15 individual who is a member of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska on the day before the 16 effective date of this Act continues to serve on the Regulatory Commission of Alaska until the 17 member's term expires and a successor is appointed and qualified. The governor shall make 18 appointments for vacancies that occur on or after the effective date of this Act in accordance 19 with AS 42.04.020(a), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.